Alaska statutes. Title 39. Public Officers and Employees.
Article 4. Contributions by Employees.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for ch. 20, SLA 2007 (SB 123), proposing needed corrections and clarifications of statutes enacted as part of the 2005 legislation establishing defined contributions retirement plans and making related amendments to defined benefit retirement plans, see 2007 Senate Journal 567 — 570.

Sec. 39.35.160.
Amount of employee contributions.

Beginning January 1, 1987, each peace officer or firefighter shall contribute to the plan an amount equal to seven and one-half percent of the peace officer’s or firefighter’s compensation. Except as provided in (d) of this section, beginning January 1, 1987, each other employee shall contribute to the plan an amount equal to six and three-quarters percent of the employee’s compensation. The contributions shall be deducted by the employer at the end of each payroll period. The contributions shall be deducted from employee compensation before computation of applicable federal taxes, and the contributions shall be treated as employer contributions under 26 U.S.C. 414(h)(2). A member may not have the option of making the payroll deduction directly instead of having the contribution picked up by the employer.

[Repealed, § 6 ch 135 SLA 1980 and § 39 ch 146 SLA 1980.]

An employee who has made an election under AS

39.35.300(c)

or

39.35.310(c)

to have the employee’s years of service as a noncertificated employee of a state boarding school, of a school district or regional educational attendance area, of the special education service agency, or of the Alaska Vocational Technical Center determined by reference to AS

14.25.220

shall pay a contribution surcharge for that service. The amount of the surcharge is the difference between the amount the employer would have had to contribute under AS

39.35.255

—

39.35.290

for the employee when treating the employee’s credited service as service earned under AS

39.35.300(c)

or

39.35.310(c)

less the amount the employer would have had to contribute under AS

39.35.255

—

39.35.290

without treating the employee’s credited service as service earned under AS 39.35.300(c) or 39.35.310(c).

The employer of a member who is employed by a school district, a regional educational attendance area, or a state boarding school who is assaulted while on the job and who, as a result of a physical injury from the assault, is placed on unpaid leave of absence or is receiving benefits under AS 23.30, shall pay the member’s contributions under this section while the member is, as a result of the on-the-job injury, on unpaid leave or receiving the benefits under AS 23.30.

History.

(§ 8 a ch 143 SLA 1960; am § 2 ch 235 SLA 1968; am § 3 ch 35 SLA 1969; am § 5 ch 109 SLA 1970; am § 5 ch 159 SLA 1972; am § 2 ch 58 SLA 1979; § 6 ch 135 SLA 1980; am § 39 ch 146 SLA 1980; am § 15 ch 82 SLA 1986; am § 1 ch 22 SLA 1999; am §§ 4, 5 ch 52 SLA 2000; am § 36 ch 68 SLA 2000; am § 30 ch 59 SLA 2002; am § 10 ch 13 SLA 2008)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1989, the term “fire fighter” was substituted for “fireman” in this section under § 60, ch. 50, SLA 1989.

Subsection (d) was enacted as (c).
Relettered in 2000, at which time a conforming amendment was made in subsection (a).

Under sec. 144, ch. 9, FSSLA 2005, “plan” was substituted for “system” in this section.

Cross references. —

For a provision relating to ch. 52, SLA 2000, which amended subsection (a) and enacted subsection (d), see sec. 7, ch. 52, SLA 2000 in the 2000 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For benefits under the defined benefit plan ( AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

), see 2 AAC 35, art. 3.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 2, ch. 123, SLA 1976, and § 1, ch. 58, SLA 1979, contained amendments to subsection (a) of this section. Both Acts provided that the amendments take effect only if approved by a majority of the votes cast in special elections conducted by the Department of Administration among the active members of the Public Employees’ Retirement System. The amendments were rejected.

Sec. 39.35.165.
Purchase of credited service.

An employee who is eligible to purchase credited service under AS

39.35.310

,

39.35.330

,

39.35.340

,

39.35.342

,

39.35.345

,

39.35.360

, or

39.35.370

, a member who is eligible to purchase credited service under AS

39.35.375

, or an elected public official who is eligible to purchase credited service under AS

39.35.381

is an employee for purposes of this section. An employee may, in lieu of making payments directly to the plan, elect to have the employee’s employer make payments as provided in this section.

An employee may elect to have the employer make payments for all or any portion of the amounts payable for the employee’s purchase of credited service through a salary reduction program as follows:

the amounts paid under a salary reduction program are in lieu of contributions by the employee making the election; the electing employee’s salary or other compensation shall be reduced by the amount paid by the employer under this subsection;

the employee shall make an irrevocable election under this section to purchase credited service as permitted in AS

39.35.310

,

39.35.330

,

39.35.340

,

39.35.342

,

39.35.345

,

39.35.360

,

39.35.370

,

39.35.375

, or

39.35.381

and before the employee’s termination of employment; the irrevocable election must specify the number of payroll periods that deductions will be made from the employee’s compensation and the dollar amount of deductions for each payroll period during the specified number of payroll periods; the deductions made under this paragraph cease upon the earlier of the member’s termination of employment with the employer or the member’s death; amounts paid by an employer under (f) of this section may not be applied toward the payment of the dollar amount of the deductions representing the portion of the credited service that is being purchased by the member through payroll deduction in accordance with the member’s irrevocable election under this subsection;

amounts paid by an employer under this subsection shall be treated as employer contributions for the purpose of determining tax treatment under the Internal Revenue Code; the amounts paid by the employer under this section may not be included in the member’s gross income for income tax purposes until those amounts are distributed by refund or retirement benefit payments.

Unless otherwise provided, employee contributions paid by the employer under this section are treated for all other purposes under the plan in the same manner and to the same extent as employee contributions that are not paid by an employer under this section and AS

39.35.160

. The plan may assess interest or administrative charges attributable to any salary reduction election made under this section. The interest or administrative charges shall be added to the contribution that is made to the plan by the employee each payroll period, and that is paid by the employer. The interest or administrative charges may not be treated as employee contributions for any purposes under AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

, and an employee or an employee’s beneficiary does not have a right to the return of the interest or administrative charges. Interest assessed under this section shall be at the rate specified by regulations adopted by the board.

For plan fiscal years beginning on or after July 1, 2001, the requirements of AS

39.35.370(i)

may not be applied to reduce the amount of credited service that may be purchased under this section by an employee who first becomes an employee of the plan before July 1, 2001, to an amount that is less than the amount of credited service allowed to be purchased with the application of any of the limits prescribed in 26 U.S.C. 415.

Contributions to the plan to purchase credited service do not qualify for treatment under this section if recognition of that service would cause an employee to receive a retirement benefit for the same service from the plan and from one or more other retirement plans or systems of the state.

The board may accept rollover contributions from a member. A rollover contribution as described in this subsection shall also be treated as employer contributions for the purpose of determining tax treatment under the Internal Revenue Code and may be made by any one or a combination of the following methods:

subject to the limitations prescribed in 26 U.S.C. 401(a)(3) and 26 U.S.C. 402(c), accepting eligible rollover distributions directly from one or more eligible retirement plans as defined by 26 U.S.C. 402(c)(8)(B);

subject to the limitations prescribed in 26 U.S.C. 403(b)(13), accepting direct trustee-to-trustee transfers of all or a portion of the accounts of the member, on or after January 1, 2002, from a tax sheltered annuity described in 26 U.S.C. 403(b);

subject to the limitations prescribed in 26 U.S.C. 457(e)(17), accepting direct trustee-to-trustee transfers of all or a portion of the accounts of the member, on or after January 1, 2002, from an eligible deferred compensation plan of a tax-exempt organization or a state or local government described in 26 U.S.C. 457(b);

accepting direct trustee-to-trustee transfer from an account established for the benefit of the member in AS

39.30.150

—

39.30.180

(Alaska Supplemental Annuity Plan).

Payments made under this section shall be applied to reduce the employee’s outstanding indebtedness described in AS

39.35.310

,

39.35.330

,

39.35.340

,

39.35.342

,

39.35.345

,

39.35.360

,

39.35.370

,

39.35.375

, or

39.35.381

at the time that the contributions are received by the plan.

If an employee retires before all payments are made under this section, the plan shall calculate the employee’s benefits based only on the payments actually made with respect to the credited service purchased.

On satisfaction of the eligibility requirements of AS

39.35.310

,

39.35.330

,

39.35.340

, 39.35.341,

39.35.345

,

39.35.360

,

39.35.370

,

39.35.375

, or

39.35.381

, the requirements of this section, and the administrative filing requirements specified by the commissioner, the plan shall adjust the employee’s credited service history and add any additional service credits acquired.

After an election is made under this section, the election is binding on and irrevocable for the employee and the employee’s employer during the employee’s remaining period of current employment, and the employee does not have the option of choosing to receive the contributed amounts directly in cash.

History.

(§ 31 ch 59 SLA 2002; am §§ 22, 23, 32 ch 92 SLA 2004; am §§ 89 — 93 ch 9 FSSLA 2005; am §§ 59, 60 ch 20 SLA 2007)

Revisor’s notes. —

Under sec. 144, ch. 9, FSSLA 2005, in this section “plan” was substituted for “system” and “AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

” was substituted for “this chapter”.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 91, ch. 9, FSSLA 2005 was to have amended subsection (f) effective June 30, 2010, but § 91, ch. 9, FSSLA 2005 was repealed by § 116(c), ch. 20, SLA 2007, effective June 7, 2007.

Sec. 39.35.170.
Employment contributions mandatory.

Contributions of employees shall be made by payroll deductions.
Every included employee shall be considered to consent to payroll deductions.
It is of no consequence that a payroll deduction may cause the compensation paid in cash to an employee to be reduced below the minimum required by law. Payment of an employee’s compensation, less payroll deductions, is a full and complete discharge and satisfaction of all claims and demands by the employee relating to remuneration of services during the period covered by the payment, except with respect to the benefits provided under the plan.

History.

(§ 8 b ch 143 SLA 1960; am § 3 ch 155 SLA 1966)

Revisor’s notes. —

Under sec. 144, ch. 9, FSSLA 2005, “plan” was substituted for “system” in this section.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Given AS

39.35.120(b)

and this section, which make inclusion in the public employees retirement system (AS 39.35) a condition of employment for state employees and contributions to it mandatory, the conclusion is that the legislature intended the statutory provisions of the public employees retirement system to apply to all state employees, and benefits under the public employees retirement system may not be negotiated under the Public Employment Relations Act (AS

23.40.070

—

23.40.260

). January 23, 1978 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 39.35.180.
Voluntary contributions by employee.

In addition to the mandatory contributions required of an employee under AS

39.35.170

, an employee may, during each calendar year of participating in the plan, voluntarily contribute to an employee savings account an amount not to exceed five percent of the employee’s compensation for that year.

History.

(§ 8 c ch 143 SLA 1960)

Revisor’s notes. —

Under sec. 144, ch. 9, FSSLA 2005, “plan” was substituted for “system” in this section.

Administrative Code. —

For administration, see 2 AAC 35, art. 2.

Sec. 39.35.190.
Disposition of contributions. [Repealed, § 55 ch 128 SLA 1977.]

Sec. 39.35.195.
Rollover distributions and rollover contributions.

A distributee may elect, at the time and in the manner prescribed by the administrator, to have all or part of an eligible rollover distribution paid directly to an eligible retirement plan specified by the distributee in the direct rollover.

Except as provided by AS

39.35.165(f)

, the plan does not accept contributions of eligible rollover distributions.

In this section,

“direct rollover” means the payment of an eligible rollover distribution by the plan to an eligible retirement plan specified by a distributee who is eligible to elect a direct rollover;

“distributee” means a member or a beneficiary who is the surviving spouse of the member or an alternate payee;

“eligible retirement plan” means

an individual retirement account described in 26 U.S.C. 408(a);

an individual retirement annuity defined in 26 U.S.C. 408(b);

an annuity plan described in 26 U.S.C. 403(a);

a qualified trust described in 26 U.S.C. 401(a);

on and after January 1, 2002, an annuity plan described in 26 U.S.C. 403(b);

on or after January 1, 2002, a governmental plan described in 26 U.S.C. 457(b); or

on or after January 1, 2008, a Roth IRA described in 26 U.S.C. 408A;

“eligible rollover distribution” means a distribution of all or part of a total account to a distributee, except for

a distribution that is one of a series of substantially equal installments payable not less frequently than annually over the life expectancy of the distributee or the joint and last survivor life expectancy of the distributee and the distributee’s designated beneficiary, as defined in 26 U.S.C. 401(a)(9);

a distribution that is one of a series of substantially equal installments payable not less frequently than annually over a specified period of 10 years or more;

a distribution that is required under 26 U.S.C. 401(a)(9);

the portion of any distribution that is not includable in gross income; however, a portion under this subparagraph may be transferred only to an individual retirement account or annuity described in 26 U.S.C. 408(a) or (b), to a qualified plan described in 26 U.S.C. 401(a) or 403(a), or to an annuity contract described in 26 U.S.C. 403(b), that agrees to separately account for amounts transferred, including separately accounting for the portion of the distribution that is includable in gross income and the portion of the distribution that is not includable in gross income; and

other distributions that are reasonably expected to total less than $200 during a year.

History.

(§ 32 ch 59 SLA 2002; am §§ 61 — 64 ch 20 SLA 2007)

Revisor’s notes. —

Under sec. 144, ch. 9, FSSLA 2005, “plan” was substituted for “system” in this section.

Sec. 39.35.200.
Refund upon termination of employment for reason other than death.

Except as provided in (c) of this section, an inactive employee, not on leave-without-pay status or layoff status, is entitled to receive a refund of the balance of the employee contribution account.

An employee who is reemployed with an employer and whose contributions have not been refunded before reemployment is not eligible for a refund.

An employee who is terminated and is a vested employee, deferred vested employee, or who is entitled to benefits under AS

39.35.385

, and who is married at the time of application for a refund or whose rights to a refund are subject to a qualified domestic relations order is entitled to receive a refund of the balance of the employee contribution account only if the employee’s present spouse and each person entitled under the order consent to the refund in writing on a form provided by the administrator. The administrator may waive written consent from the person entitled to benefits under the order if the administrator determines that the person cannot be located or for other reasons established by regulation. The administrator may waive written consent from the spouse if the administrator determines that

the employee was not married to the spouse during any period of the employee’s employment with an employer;

the spouse has no rights under AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

because of the terms of a qualified domestic relations order;

the spouse cannot be located;

the employee and spouse have been married for less than two years and the member establishes that they are not cohabiting; or

other reasons established by regulation exist.

An employee who receives a refund of contributions in accordance with this section forfeits corresponding credited service under AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

.

History.

(§ 9 a ch 143 SLA 1960; am § 12 ch 1 SLA 1974; am § 1 ch 81 SLA 1976; am § 22 ch 128 SLA 1977; am § 45 ch 137 SLA 1982; am §§ 32, 33 ch 117 SLA 1986; am § 24 ch 92 SLA 2004; am § 94 ch 9 FSSLA 2005)

Revisor’s notes. —

Under sec. 144, ch. 9, FSSLA 2005, “AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

” was substituted for “this chapter” in this section.

Administrative Code. —

For benefits under the defined benefit plan ( AS

39.35.095

—

39.35.680

), see 2 AAC 35, art. 3.

Secs. 39.35.210, 39.35.220.
Refunds. [Repealed, § 55 ch 128 SLA 1977.]

Sec. 39.35.230.
Refund upon death of retired employee.

Upon the death of a retired employee, the employee’s beneficiary shall be paid

the excess of the balance in the employee contribution account of the deceased employee as of the date of the beginning of the employee’s pension payments over the sum of the pension payments previously received by the employee, but this amount may not be paid if a joint and survivor option under AS

39.35.450

is in effect or if a surviving spouse’s pension under AS

39.35.440

is payable; and

the remaining payments purchased by the balance in the employee savings account of the deceased employee as of the date the employee retired.

History.

(§ 9 d ch 143 SLA 1960; am § 107 ch 127 SLA 1974)

Sec. 39.35.240.
Withdrawal of voluntary contributions.

An active employee may withdraw a savings account only if the employee receives the consent of the administrator.
The administrator may permit a withdrawal before termination of employment only in cases of financial need.

History.

(§ 9 e ch 143 SLA 1960; am § 23 ch 128 SLA 1977)